Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-750
Department;
duties; rules and regulations.

(1) The department shall be responsible
for the administration and enforcement of the Residential Mortgage Licensing
Act.

(2) The department may adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations
as it may deem necessary in the administration of the act and not inconsistent
with the act. The department shall make a good faith effort to provide a copy
of the notice of hearing as required by section 84-907 in a timely manner
to all licensees. Such notice may be sent electronically to licensees.

Laws 1989, LB 272, § 18;

Laws 2003, LB 218, § 10;

Laws 2007, LB124, § 48;

R.S.Supp.,2008, § 45-715;

Laws 2009, LB328, § 35.